Wyoming, session 2025, HB0022.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 19-13-108 and 35-9-152(a)(i) are
amended to read:
19-13-108. Local programs; authorized; local homeland
security plan; coordinators; appointment and removal.
Each political subdivision of this state shall establish a
local homeland security program in accordance with the
state homeland security plan and program. Each political
subdivision through the homeland security program will
cause to be prepared a local homeland security plan which
will include actions essential to the recovery and
restoration of the economy by supply and resupply of
resources to meet urgent survival and military needs and to
provide for the ongoing management of resources available
to meet continuing survival and recovery needs. Each local
homeland security plan shall require coordination with each
certified water and wastewater operator necessary to
provide emergency and public safety services for homeland
security. Each local homeland security program shall have a
coordinator appointed by the governor upon the
recommendation of the local jurisdiction. The coordinator
has direct responsibility for the organization,
administration and operation of the local homeland security
program subject to the direction and control of the local
jurisdiction under the general direction of the governor.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0022
ENROLLED ACT NO. 5, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
The governor may remove any coordinator as provided in W.S.
9-1-202.
35-9-152. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(i) "Emergency responders" means public, state
or federal fire services, law enforcement, emergency
medical services, public health, public works including
certified water and wastewater operators, homeland security
and other public response services or agencies that would
be involved in direct actions to contain or control a
hazardous material release, weapons of mass destruction
incident or clandestine laboratory investigation. The term
"emergency responders" does not include private on-site
facilities with immediate emergency response capabilities
unless formally requested to assist off the private
facility site by the state or a political subdivision of
the state;
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0022
ENROLLED ACT NO. 5, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
3